Utah statutes.
76-10-708.   Refusing inspection of books.

Every officer or agent of any corporation having or keeping an office within this state, who has in his custody or control the books of such corporation, and who refuses to give to a bona fide stockholder of record or member of the corporation, lawfully demanding during office hours, the right to inspect or take a copy of it or of any part thereof, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

